fst/nom_stems.lexc
! Nominal stems — generated from Twanksta data
! Source: ../../prussian-corpus/parsed/twanksta_entries.json

LEXICON Nouns
  N1_stems ;
  N2_stems ;
  N6_stems ;
  N7_stems ;
  N32_stems ;
  N33_stems ;
  N34_stems ;
  N35_stems ;
  N36_stems ;
  N37_stems ;
  N38_stems ;
  N39_stems ;
  N40_stems ;
  N41_stems ;
  N42_stems ;
  N43_stems ;
  N44_stems ;
  N45_stems ;
  N46_stems ;
  N47_stems ;
  N48_stems ;
  N49_stems ;
  N50_stems ;
  N51_stems ;
  N52_stems ;
  N53_stems ;
  N54_stems ;
  N55_stems ;
  N56_stems ;
  N57_stems ;
  N58_stems ;
  N60_stems ;
  N61_stems ;
  N62_stems ;
  N63_stems ;
  N64_stems ;
  N65_stems ;
  N66_stems ;
  N67_stems ;
  N68_stems ;
  N69_stems ;
  N71_stems ;
  N72_stems ;
  N73_stems ;
  N75_stems ;
  N76_stems ;
  N77_stems ;
  N79_stems ;
  N81_stems ;
  N82_stems ;
  N83_stems ;
  N84_stems ;
  N85_stems ;
  N86_stems ;
  N87_stems ;
  N88_stems ;
  N89_stems ;
  N90_stems ;
  N91_stems ;
  N92_stems ;
  N93_stems ;
  N94_stems ;
  N95_stems ;
  N96_stems ;
  N97_stems ;
  N98_stems ;
  N99_stems ;
  N100_stems ;
  N102_stems ;
  N104_stems ;
  N106_stems ;
  N107_stems ;
  N108_stems ;
  N109_stems ;
  N110_stems ;
  N111_stems ;
  N112_stems ;
  N113_stems ;
  N114_stems ;
  N115_stems ;
  N116_stems ;
  N117_stems ;
  N118_stems ;
  N119_stems ;
  N120_stems ;
  N121_stems ;
  N122_stems ;
  N123_stems ;
  N124_stems ;
  N125_stems ;
  N126_stems ;
  N128_stems ;
  N131_stems ;
  N132_stems ;
  N133_stems ;
  N134_stems ;
  N135_stems ;
  N136_stems ;
  N137_stems ;
  N138_stems ;
  N139_stems ;
  N140_stems ;
  N141_stems ;
  N142_stems ;
  N143_stems ;
  N144_stems ;
  N35a_stems ;
  N76s_stems ;
  N80b_stems ;
  N134a_stems ;
  N75b_stems ;
  N81b_stems ;
  N40a_stems ;
  N81c_stems ;
  N81a_stems ;
  N75a_stems ;
  N106d_stems ;
  N102a_stems ;
  N0n_stems ;
  N106b_stems ;
  N137a_stems ;
  N82a_stems ;
  N97a_stems ;

LEXICON Adjectives
  A25_stems ;
  A26_stems ;
  A27_stems ;
  A28_stems ;
  A29_stems ;
  A30_stems ;
  A31_stems ;

! N1 — 1 entries
LEXICON N1_stems
  as+N+Sg+Nom:as  # ;
  as+N+Pl+Nom:mes  # ;
  as+N+Sg+Gen:māise  # ;
  as+N+Pl+Gen:nūse  # ;
  as+N+Sg+Dat:mennei  # ;
  as+N+Pl+Dat:nūmans  # ;
  as+N+Sg+Akk:men  # ;
  as+N+Pl+Akk:mans  # ;

! N2 — 1 entries
LEXICON N2_stems
  tū+N+Sg+Nom:tū  # ;
  tū+N+Pl+Nom:jūs  # ;
  tū+N+Sg+Gen:twāise  # ;
  tū+N+Pl+Gen:jūse  # ;
  tū+N+Sg+Dat:tebbei  # ;
  tū+N+Pl+Dat:jūmans  # ;
  tū+N+Sg+Akk:ten  # ;
  tū+N+Pl+Akk:wans  # ;

! N6 — 1 entries
LEXICON N6_stems
  mes+N+Sg+Nom:as  # ;
  mes+N+Pl+Nom:mes  # ;
  mes+N+Sg+Gen:māise  # ;
  mes+N+Pl+Gen:nūse  # ;
  mes+N+Sg+Dat:mennei  # ;
  mes+N+Pl+Dat:nūmans  # ;
  mes+N+Sg+Akk:men  # ;
  mes+N+Pl+Akk:mans  # ;

! N7 — 1 entries
LEXICON N7_stems
  jūs+N+Sg+Nom:tū  # ;
  jūs+N+Pl+Nom:jūs  # ;
  jūs+N+Sg+Gen:twāise  # ;
  jūs+N+Pl+Gen:jūse  # ;
  jūs+N+Sg+Dat:tebbei  # ;
  jūs+N+Pl+Dat:jūmans  # ;
  jūs+N+Sg+Akk:ten  # ;
  jūs+N+Pl+Akk:wans  # ;

! N33 — 1 entries
LEXICON N33_stems
  šmaws+N+Sg+Nom+Masc:šmaws  # ;
  šmaws+N+Pl+Nom+Masc:šmāuwai  # ;
  šmaws+N+Sg+Gen+Masc:šmāuwas  # ;
  šmaws+N+Pl+Gen+Masc:šmāuwan  # ;
  šmaws+N+Sg+Dat+Masc:šmāuwu  # ;
  šmaws+N+Pl+Dat+Masc:šmāuamans  # ;
  šmaws+N+Sg+Akk+Masc:šmāuwan  # ;
  šmaws+N+Pl+Akk+Masc:šmāuwans  # ;

! N34 — 1 entries
LEXICON N34_stems
  aliskans+N+Sg+Nom+Masc:aliskans  # ;
  aliskans+N+Pl+Nom+Masc:alisknai  # ;
  aliskans+N+Sg+Gen+Masc:alisknas  # ;
  aliskans+N+Pl+Gen+Masc:alisknan  # ;
  aliskans+N+Sg+Dat+Masc:alisknu  # ;
  aliskans+N+Pl+Dat+Masc:alisknamans  # ;
  aliskans+N+Sg+Akk+Masc:alisknan  # ;
  aliskans+N+Pl+Akk+Masc:alisknans  # ;

! N47 — 6 entries
LEXICON N47_stems
  pagalba+N+Sg+Nom+Masc:pagalba  # ;
  pagalba+N+Pl+Nom+Masc:pagalbas  # ;
  pagalba+N+Sg+Gen+Masc:pagalbas  # ;
  pagalba+N+Pl+Gen+Masc:pagalban  # ;
  pagalba+N+Sg+Dat+Masc:pagalbai  # ;
  pagalba+N+Pl+Dat+Masc:pagalbamans  # ;
  pagalba+N+Sg+Akk+Masc:pagalban  # ;
  pagalba+N+Pl+Akk+Masc:pagalbans  # ;
  salūba+N+Sg+Nom+Masc:salūba  # ;
  salūba+N+Pl+Nom+Masc:salūbas  # ;
  salūba+N+Sg+Gen+Masc:salūbas  # ;
  salūba+N+Pl+Gen+Masc:salūban  # ;
  salūba+N+Sg+Dat+Masc:salūbai  # ;
  salūba+N+Pl+Dat+Masc:salūbamans  # ;
  salūba+N+Sg+Akk+Masc:salūban  # ;
  salūba+N+Pl+Akk+Masc:salūbans  # ;
  miksa+N+Sg+Nom+Masc:miksa  # ;
  miksa+N+Pl+Nom+Masc:miksas  # ;
  miksa+N+Sg+Gen+Masc:miksas  # ;
  miksa+N+Pl+Gen+Masc:miksan  # ;
  miksa+N+Sg+Dat+Masc:miksai  # ;
  miksa+N+Pl+Dat+Masc:miksamans  # ;
  miksa+N+Sg+Akk+Masc:miksan  # ;
  miksa+N+Pl+Akk+Masc:miksans  # ;
  mummaša+N+Sg+Nom+Masc:mummaša  # ;
  mummaša+N+Pl+Nom+Masc:mummašas  # ;
  mummaša+N+Sg+Gen+Masc:mummašas  # ;
  mummaša+N+Pl+Gen+Masc:mummašan  # ;
  mummaša+N+Sg+Dat+Masc:mummašai  # ;
  mummaša+N+Pl+Dat+Masc:mummašamans  # ;
  mummaša+N+Sg+Akk+Masc:mummašan  # ;
  mummaša+N+Pl+Akk+Masc:mummašans  # ;
  wāldwika+N+Sg+Nom+Masc:wāldwika  # ;
  wāldwika+N+Pl+Nom+Masc:wāldwikas  # ;
  wāldwika+N+Sg+Gen+Masc:wāldwikas  # ;
  wāldwika+N+Pl+Gen+Masc:wāldwikan  # ;
  wāldwika+N+Sg+Dat+Masc:wāldwikai  # ;
  wāldwika+N+Pl+Dat+Masc:wāldwikamans  # ;
  wāldwika+N+Sg+Akk+Masc:wāldwikan  # ;
  wāldwika+N+Pl+Akk+Masc:wāldwikans  # ;
  āubirga+N+Sg+Nom+Masc:āubirga  # ;
  āubirga+N+Pl+Nom+Masc:āubirgas  # ;
  āubirga+N+Sg+Gen+Masc:āubirgas  # ;
  āubirga+N+Pl+Gen+Masc:āubirgan  # ;
  āubirga+N+Sg+Dat+Masc:āubirgai  # ;
  āubirga+N+Pl+Dat+Masc:āubirgamans  # ;
  āubirga+N+Sg+Akk+Masc:āubirgan  # ;
  āubirga+N+Pl+Akk+Masc:āubirgans  # ;

! N48 — 1 entries
LEXICON N48_stems
  brūnagalwa+N+Sg+Nom+Masc:brūnagalwa  # ;
  brūnagalwa+N+Pl+Nom+Masc:brūnagalwa  # ;
  brūnagalwa+N+Sg+Gen+Masc:brūnagalwa  # ;
  brūnagalwa+N+Pl+Gen+Masc:brūnagalwa  # ;
  brūnagalwa+N+Sg+Dat+Masc:brūnagalwa  # ;
  brūnagalwa+N+Pl+Dat+Masc:brūnagalwa  # ;
  brūnagalwa+N+Sg+Akk+Masc:brūnagalwa  # ;
  brūnagalwa+N+Pl+Akk+Masc:brūnagalwa  # ;
